California, session 20252026, AB1286.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 82004.2 is added to the Government Code, to read:82004.2. “Arrangement for prospective employment” means an agreement pursuant to which a prospective employer’s offer of employment has been accepted by the prospective employee, including through verbal or written acceptance.SEC. 2. Section 87202 of the Government Code is amended to read:87202. (a) (1) A person who is elected, appointed, or nominated to an office specified in Section 87200 shall file a statement disclosing the person’s investments and the person’s interests in real property held on the date of assuming office, income received during the 12 months before assuming office, and any arrangement for prospective employment if employment with that employer had not begun as of the date of assuming office.(2) A person who is elected to an office specified in Section 87200 shall file the statement specified in paragraph (1) within 30 days of assuming office.(3) A person who is appointed or nominated to an office specified in Section 87200 shall file the a statement specified in paragraph (1) within 30 days of assuming office, provided, however, that a person appointed or nominated to such an office who is subject to confirmation by the Commission on Judicial Appointments or the Senate shall file such a statement no more than 10 days after the appointment or nomination.(4) The statement shall not be required if the person has filed, within 60 days prior to assuming office, a statement for the same jurisdiction pursuant to Section 87203.(b) Every elected state officer who assumes office during the month of December or January shall file a statement pursuant to Section 87203 instead of this section, except that:(1) The period covered for reporting investments and interests in real property shall begin on the date the person filed the person’s declarations of candidacy.(2) The period covered for reporting income shall begin 12 months prior to the date the person assumed office.SEC. 3. Section 87203 of the Government Code is amended to read:87203. A person who holds an office specified in Section 87200 shall, each year at a time specified by commission regulations, file a statement disclosing the person’s investments, interests in real property, income, and arrangements for prospective employment during the period since the previous statement filed under this section or Section 87202. The statement shall include any investments and interest in real property held at any time during the period covered by the statement, whether or not they are still held at the time of filing.SEC. 4. Section 87204 of the Government Code is amended to read:87204. A person who leaves an office specified in Section 87200 shall, within 30 days after leaving the office, file a statement disclosing the person’s investments, interests in real property, income, and arrangements for prospective employment during the period since the previous statement filed under Sections 87202 or 87203. The statement shall include any investments and interests in real property held at any time during the period covered by the statement, whether or not they are still held at the time of filing.SEC. 5. Section 87207.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:87207.5. When an arrangement for prospective employment is required to be reported under this article, the statement shall contain the date that the filer accepted the prospective employer’s offer of employment, the business position, a general description of the business activity of the prospective employer, and the name and street address of the prospective employer.SEC. 6. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.